Illinois, session 104th, SB1190.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by adding 5Section 5-156.5 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/5-156.5 new)7    Sec. 5-156.5. Presumption of disability; reinstatement. 8    (a) A policeman who applies for disability benefits under 9this Article and has been denied reinstatement as a policeman 10by his or her employer because of a physical or mental 11incapacity shall be presumed to be disabled as that term is 12used in this Article.13    (b) No policeman who otherwise meets the requirements for 14a disability benefit shall be denied a disability benefit 15unless and until the policeman's employer reinstates him or 16her as a policeman or offers him or her a limited-duty 17position.18    (c) This Section shall apply retroactively to January 1, 192023. Any policeman who has been denied a disability benefit 20without an offer of reinstatement or a limited-duty position 21after January 1, 2023 shall be entitled to retroactive 22disability benefits. Notwithstanding Section 1-103.1, this 23Section applies without regard to whether the policeman was in   SB1190- 2 -LRB104 07480 RPS 17523 b1service on or after the effective date of this amendatory Act 2of the 104th General Assembly. 3    Section 90. The State Mandates Act is amended by adding 4Section 8.49 as follows: 5    (30 ILCS 805/8.49 new)6    Sec. 8.49. Exempt mandate. Notwithstanding Sections 6 and 78 of this Act, no reimbursement by the State is required for 8the implementation of any mandate created by this amendatory 9Act of the 104th General Assembly. 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 11becoming law.